North Dakota, session 69, SB2224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 53-06.1-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
53-06.1-01.1. Gaming commissionAttorney general - Gaming - Rules.
1. The state gaming commission consists of the chairman and four other members
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The members serve
three-year terms and until a successor is appointed and qualified. If the senate is not
in session when the term of a member expires, the governor may make an interim
appointment, and the interim appointee holds office until the senate confirms or rejects
the appointment. A member appointed to fill a vacancy arising from other than the
natural expiration of a term serves only for the unexpired portion of the term. The
terms of the commissioners must be staggered so no more than two terms expire
each July first.
2. A person is ineligible for appointment to the commission if that person has not been a
resident of this state for at least two years before the date of appointment. A person is
also ineligible if that person is not of such character and reputation as to promote
public confidence in the administration of gaming in this state. A person is also
ineligible if that person has been convicted of a felony criminal offense or has pled
guilty or been found guilty of any violation of chapter 12.1-06, 12.1-08, 12.1-09,
12.1-10, 12.1-11, 12.1-12, 12.1-22, 12.1-23, 12.1-24, 12.1-28, 53-06.1, or 53-06.2, or
has pled guilty or been found guilty of any violation of section 6-08-16 or 6-08-16.2, or
Page No. 1 25.1099.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
has pled guilty or been found guilty of any offense or violation that has a direct bearing
on the person's fitness to be involved in gaming, or who has committed an equivalent
offense or violation of the laws of another state or of the United States. A person who
has a financial interest in gaming or is an employee or a member of the gaming
committee of a licensed organization or distributor cannot be a member of the
commission. For the purpose of this subsection, a financial interest includes the
receiving of any direct payment from an eligible organization for property, services, or
facilities provided to that organization.
3. Commission members are entitled to seventy-five dollars per day for compensation for
each day spent on commission duties and mileage and expense reimbursement as
allowed to other state employees.
4. The commissionattorney general shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32, to
administer and regulate the gaming industry, including methods:
1. Methods of conduct, play, and promotion of games; minimum
2. Minimum procedures and standards for recordkeeping and internal control; requiring
3. Requiring tax returns and reports from organizations or distributors; methods
4. Methods of competition and doing business by distributors and manufacturers;
acquisition
5. Acquisition and use of gaming equipment; quality
6. Quality standards or specifications for the manufacture of pull tabs, paper bingo cards,
electronic pull tab devices, pull tab dispensing devices, bingo card marking devices,
and fifty-fifty raffle systems; to
7. To ensure that net proceeds are used for educational, charitable, patriotic, fraternal,
religious, or public-spirited uses; to
8. To protect and promote the public interest; to
9. To ensure fair and honest games; to
10. To ensure that fees and taxes are paid; and to
11. To prevent and detect unlawful gambling activity.
Page No. 2 25.1099.01000